Utah statutes.
41-1a-518.   Duplicate titles.
(1) (a)  If a certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, or becomes
illegible, the owner, legal representative, or successor in interest of the
owner of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor for which the certificate was
issued, as shown by the records of the division, shall immediately apply for
and may obtain a duplicate upon furnishing information satisfactory to the
division.
(b)  A certificate of title issued under this section shall have printed or
stamped in ink upon its face "duplicate".
(c)  The duplicate certificate, when properly issued, supersedes and
invalidates all other certificates previously issued.
(2) (a)  When the application for a duplicate certificate of title is
accompanied by a proper release of interest from the owner or owners of record
and a proper release of interest from the lienholder of record and the release
is accompanied by a proper application to title the vehicle, vessel, or
outboard motor in the name of the new owner or owners, a duplicate certificate
need not be made.
(b)  The division may issue a certificate of title in the name of the new
owner or owners.
(c)  The duplicate title fees provided under Part 12, Fee and Tax
Requirements, apply.
